Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.099

Department of enterprise services—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply in the department of enterprise services to the director, the director's confidential secretary, deputy and assistant directors, and any other exempt staff members provided for in RCW 43.19.008.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 106.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.